Utah statutes.
75-3-804.   Manner of presentation of claims.
(1)  Claims against a decedent's estate may be presented as follows:
(a)  The claimant may deliver or mail to the personal representative, or the
personal representative's attorney of record, a written statement of the claim
indicating its basis, the name and address of the claimant, and the amount
claimed, or may file a written statement of the claim, in the form prescribed
by rule, with the clerk of the court.  The claim is deemed presented on either
the receipt of the written statement of claim by the personal representative
or the personal representative's attorney of record, or the filing of the
claim with the court, whichever occurs first.  If a claim is not yet due, the
date when it will become due shall be stated.  If the claim is contingent or
unliquidated, the nature of the uncertainty shall be stated.  If the claim is
secured, the security shall be described.  Failure to describe correctly the
security, the nature of any uncertainty, and the due date of a claim not yet
due does not invalidate the presentation made.
(b)  The claimant may commence a proceeding against the personal
representative in any court where the personal representative may be subjected
to jurisdiction to obtain payment of the claim against the estate, but the
commencement of the proceeding must occur within the time limited for
presenting the claim.  No presentation of claim is required in regard to
matters claimed in proceedings against the decedent which were pending at the
time of the decedent's death.
(2)  If a claim is presented under Subsection (1)(a), no proceeding thereon
may be commenced more than 60 days after the personal representative has
mailed a notice of disallowance; but, in the case of a claim which is not
presently due or which is contingent or unliquidated, the personal
representative may consent to an extension of the 60-day period, or to avoid
injustice the court, on petition, may order an extension of the 60-day period,
but in no event may the extension run beyond the applicable statute of
limitations.
